District of Columbia statutes.
7-1703.01

Designated nonsmoking areas in restaurants; new construction and major renovation to existing restaurants; smoking areas.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the owner, manager, or person in charge of any restaurant having a seating capacity of 50 or more shall designate at least 25% of the total seating capacity as a nonsmoking area. Bar and lounge seating in the restaurant is excluded from this total seating capacity calculation. Smoking shall be prohibited in these nonsmoking areas even if, after a certain hour, food is no longer served.

(b)

Any new construction for the purpose of establishing a restaurant or major renovation, performed on or after March 29, 1988, to an existing restaurant, which has a seating capacity of 50 or more, shall contain a nonsmoking area that is at least 50% of the total seating capacity. Bar and lounge seating in the restaurant is excluded from this total seating capacity calculation. Smoking shall be prohibited in these nonsmoking areas even if, after a certain hour, food is no longer served. In accordance with § 7-1705(c), the Mayor shall define the term “major renovation”.

(c)

(1)

In areas where smoking is permitted pursuant to any provision of this subchapter, physical barriers or separate rooms may be used to the greatest extent possible to minimize the smoke in adjacent nonsmoking areas. Ventilation shall be in compliance with the District of Columbia laws and rules governing indoor ventilation.

(2)

No area shall be designated as a smoking area where smoking is prohibited by the Fire Marshal or by other District of Columbia laws or rules.

(3)

Smoking areas shall comply with all laws and rules of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 4a
as added Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-100, § 2(d), 35 DCR 1182
This section is referenced in § 7-1703.
1981 Ed., § 6-913.1.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-22, the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 90-192, December 13, 1990.
For complete smoking ban in all places of employment and public places, see § 7-742.